California, session 20252026, SB975.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2787 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2787. If the board requires the approval of the faculty or directors in regulations promulgated pursuant to Section 2786, all of the following apply:(a) The board may approve an individual to serve as a member of the faculty, director, or assistant director of an approved school of nursing or nursing program.(b) The board shall approve an applicant for individual approval if the applicant submits a completed application in the form prescribed by the board demonstrating that the applicant meets the requirements established by the board for faculty, directors, and assistant directors of an approved school of nursing or nursing program. program, and if needed, an approved remediation plan.(c) The individual approval under this section shall be valid for five years and may be renewed if the individual demonstrates to the board that they continue to meet the requirements established by the board for faculty, directors, and assistant directors of an approved school of nursing or nursing program.(d) The board shall display an approved individual’s faculty, director, or assistant director approval status, including the approved faculty level and content areas, if applicable, and the status of their nursing license through an online search tool administered by the department.(e) (1) If an applicant for approval at a California Community College with an approved school of nursing or nursing program under this section has a faculty position and does not meet a requirement established by the board for a different position, the board may accept a remediation plan submitted by an that approved school of nursing or nursing program to help the applicant meet the requirement.(2) If the board accepts the plan submitted under paragraph (1), (1) for faculty, the board may approve the applicant to instruct in theory under the mentorship and supervision of the content expert identified in the plan for up to one year.(3) If the board accepts the plan submitted under paragraph (1) for nursing directors or assistant directors, the board shall approve the applicant to serve under the mentorship of a board-approved director or assistant director. (f) If required by the board for directors and assistant directors of an approved school of nursing or nursing program, an approved school of nursing or nursing program shall continue to report to the board changes in the nursing program’s director and assistant director of nursing positions.(g) An approved school of nursing or nursing program shall not be required to report to the board any of the following faculty changes:(1) A change in a faculty member’s teaching area.(2) An offer of employment for a faculty member position.(3) Termination of employment of a faculty member.(h) This section does not modify any limitations on the powers of the board related to the faculty approval of accredited schools of nursing and nursing programs as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 2786.2.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.